Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 34. Uniform operation of general law.

All laws of a general nature shall have a uniform operation.

I. General Consideration.

II. Illustrative Cases.

I.General Consideration.

Cross references. —

As to special and local legislation, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const. and art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Section is equivalent of “equal protection” words of

fourteenth amendment

to the constitution of the United States.Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Legislature may pass any law not expressly or impliedly inhibited.

Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1922).

Section is satisfied by statute applying uniformly within a class. —

The provision hereof is satisfied by a statute applying uniformly within a class of persons based on reasonable distinction or objects of reasonable class and operating similarly on all parties of the state under same circumstances. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925); Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

No equal protection violation where not same class. —

Although liquor licensees in the county had different Sunday operating hours from those imposed by the city for licensees within its boundaries, there was no equal protection violation because licensees of the county were not in the same class nor under the same circumstances and conditions as licensees of the city. WW Enters. v. City of Cheyenne, 956 P.2d 353,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1998).

Classification must be based upon reason. —

Classification cannot be made without reason therefor and there must be substantial distinction between places embraced in legislation and places excluded. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Section does not proscribe reasonable classifications.

Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

Reasonable basis required for different legislation as to different classes. —

There must be some difference which furnishes a reasonable basis for different legislation as to different classes, and the differences must not be arbitrary and without just relation to the subject of the legislation. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

And sustaining facts assumed. —

If any state of facts can be reasonably conceived which sustains the classification made by a statute, such facts will be assumed. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Equal protection claims test. —

The four aspects of the test for analyzing state constitution equal protection claims inquire as to (1) what class is harmed by the legislation and has that group been subjected to a tradition of disfavor by our laws; (2) what is the public purpose to be served by the law; (3) what is the characteristic of the disadvantaged class that justifies disparate treatment; and (4) how are the characteristics used to distinguish people for disparate treatment relevant to the purpose the challenged law purportedly intends to serve. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act); Board of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 941 P.2d 742,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1997).

Two tests designed to determine if statutory classifications meet equal protection requirement.

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

It is not what a law includes that makes it special,

but what it excludes. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Legislation is special if it applies to all within a class without reason

appearing why it is not made to apply generally to all. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Distinguishing peculiarity must exist giving rise to necessity. —

To constitute general law, as opposed to special law, distinguishing peculiarity must exist giving rise to necessity for the law as to designated class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Criminal acquittees are dissimilar to civil acquittees for equal protection purposes. —

A criminal acquittee has placed his mental illness at issue, proved it by a preponderance of the evidence, and is deemed to have committed a criminal act. Such important differences render a criminal acquittee dissimilar to a civil committee for equal protection purposes. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Real property statute of limitations constitutional. —

Section

1-3-111

, which sets forth a statute of limitations for actions involving improvements to real property, is constitutional and does not violate the open courts, uniform operation of general law, and special and local laws provisions of the Wyoming constitution. Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).

Classification of cities without regard to necessity is special legislation. —

Mere classification of cities for purpose of legislation without regard to necessity is special legislation and condemned by constitution. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Distinction exists between legislation of general nature and legislation municipal in character,

and that of former class is invalid if not applicable generally, even though it may apply to all cities of particular class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Court may consider purpose of enactment. —

Purpose for which enactment creating cities of second class was passed may be considered in determining whether it is special or general legislation. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

And contemporaneous legislation as to cities of another class. —

In considering constitutionality of statute creating second class city and in determining what is reasonable or arbitrary classification, court may consider nearly contemporaneous enactment relating to cities of first class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Constitutionality of §

14-6-203

. —

The statutory scheme of §

14-6-203

is constitutional; there is no demonstrable prejudice arising out of the failure to assign the burden of proof prior to any hearing; and there was no abuse of discretion on the part of the trial judge in refusing to transfer case to juvenile court or on the part of the trial judge in transferring another case to the county court from juvenile court for a preliminary examination with the view that the case would be prosecuted in the district court. Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Change in allocation of company's oil production did not violate provision. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's ruling that changed the allocation of the company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county did not violate Art. XV, §§ 3 and 11, Wyo. Const. or Art. I, § 34, Wyo. Const. because the company had the burden of showing unconstitutionality and it failed to meet the burden imposed on it in this regard. Moreover, the arguments were not supported by reference to pertinent authority or by cogent argument. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

, 26 A.L.R.2d 647 (1951); Tennant v. Sinclair Oil & Gas Co., 355 P.2d 887,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1960); Steffey v. City of Casper, 357 P.2d 456,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1960); Sowerwine v. Nielson, 671 P.2d 295,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1983); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Mills v. Reynolds, 807 P.2d 383,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 70 Wyo. 193, 246 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1952); Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); GWJ v. MH, 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(1932); State ex rel. Keefe v. Jones, 62 Wyo. 61, 161 P.2d 135,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1945); Eastwood v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 76 Wyo. 247, 301 P.2d 818,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1956); Board of County Comm'rs v. Justice Court No. Two, 529 P.2d 977,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1974); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975); State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976); Neu v. Grant, 548 F.2d 281,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 10584

(10th Cir. 1977); Great W. Sugar Co. v. Johnson, 624 P.2d 1184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1981); Tader v. Tader, 737 P.2d 1065,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1987); In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992); Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003); Huff v. Shumate, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197 (2004); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Do Classifications Resultant from Automobile Guest Statutes Violate Constitutional Guarantees of Equal Protection?,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 251 (1974).

For comment, “Landowner Liability Under the Wyoming Recreational Use Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1980).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Equal Protection Analysis. Awarding Public Works Contracts: Granting Preference to Resident Bidders. Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 393 (1983).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For comment, “‘Primary Purpose’ Pollution Control Tax Incentives: Is the Public Getting What It's Paying For?,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1996).

For article, “Financing Wyoming's Public Schools: The Wyoming Legislature Gets to Try Again,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exemption of agricultural activities or occupations from business or occupation license or tax, 38 ALR4th 1074.

Right to workers' compensation for emotional distress or like injury suffered by claimant as result of nonsudden stimuli — Right to compensation under particular statutory provisions, 97 ALR5th 1.

II.Illustrative Cases.

Curative statute legalizing defective organization of county

was not invalid as special act. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Drainage district law

did not violate this section. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Section

15-5-203

does not violate this section.

Wyoming State Treasurer v. Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Law operating uniformly on all cities of one class or all of several recognized classes

was held not unconstitutional. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Cheyenne “Sunday Closing Ordinance.” —

The discriminations of the Cheyenne “Sunday Closing Ordinance,” under the guise of classification, are violative of this section. Nation v. Giant Drug Co., 396 P.2d 431,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1964).

Salaries. —

There is little justification in giving cities operating under substantially same form of government and of similar population different powers connected with salaries, but scale of salaries need not be same. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Hours of work. —

Statute limiting the hours of labor of females violated this section so far as it applied to restaurants. State v. Le Barron, 24 Wyo. 519, 162 P. 265,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1917).

Statute declaring 8 hours of actual work to constitute lawful day's work on public works was not violative of provision requiring all laws of general nature to have uniform operation. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Workmen's Compensation Law,

providing that compensation should be payable to dependents of persons injured in extrahazardous employment, and that extrahazardous occupations should include bakery kitchens where power machinery was used, was not based on unreasonable classification. Ideal Bakery v. Schryver, 43 Wyo. 108, 299 P. 284,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1931).

For discussion of possible discrimination against nonresident United States citizens in Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act, see Cuthbertson v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 50 Wyo. 441, 62 P.2d 311,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1936).

Section 27-14-102(a)(xi)(J), which states that a workers' compensation claimant may not recover on a claim for a mental injury where that mental injury is not the result of a compensable physical injury, does not violate the equal protection clause. Frantz v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 932 P.2d 750,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

The distinction within the workers' compensation scheme between physically injured workers and workers with stress-related mental injuries is rationally related to the state's goal of efficiently and fairly distributing benefits while cutting costs for employers. Frantz v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 932 P.2d 750,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Rational basis exists for treating employer differently from his employees

with respect to the extent of immunity under § 27-14-104(a), relating to immunity from suit under the Workers' Compensation Act. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982); Parker v. Energy Dev. Co., 691 P.2d 981,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1984).

Worker's Compensation Act (chapter 17 (now chapter 14) of title 27) does not unconstitutionally discriminate between partners and corporate officers.

A partner is an employer and employee, whereas an officer is simply an employee; a rational basis exists, therefore, for the disparate treatment afforded to partners as opposed to corporate officers. Hays v. State, 768 P.2d 11,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Unemployment Compensation Act

does not violate this section, since provision is satisfied by statute applying uniformly within a class of persons, based on reasonable distinction, or objects of reasonable class, and operating same in all parts of state under same circumstances. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Negligence immunity of co-employees unconstitutional. —

The statute which, under the Wyoming worker's compensation scheme, granted immunity from suits by co-employees to employees who were acting within the scope of their employment, §

27-14-104

, is unconstitutional because it violated the Wyoming Constitution's guarantee of equal protection. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992).

Corporations organized during territorial days. —

Since corporations organized during territorial days became corporations of the state, it may at least be questioned whether this section would not be violated by a statute authorizing “any corporation, organized under any law of this state,” to have a renewal of its franchise, if the statute were to be construed to apply only to corporations organized since statehood. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Qualification for newspapers entitled to publish legal notices. —

Former statute, providing that a newspaper having the right to publish notices with legal effect must have been established for one year or more, was not unconstitutional as violating this section. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Contract relating to excess lands and their disposition. —

The provisions of a contract between a water conservancy district and the United States, relating to excess lands and their disposition, were not violative of this section. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Education for children of state is matter of fundamental interest.

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Intent of framers of education article. —

The framers intended the education article as a mandate to the state legislature to provide an education system of a character which provides Wyoming students with a uniform opportunity to become equipped for their future roles as citizens, participants in the political system, and competitors both economically and intellectually. Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 1995).

Private School Licensing Act. —

No classification had been created by the Private School Licensing Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

, and it was unnecessary to do any further analysis under the test where those institutions that were already accredited obviously did not have to apply to become accredited, and those institutions that were not accredited had to become accredited within the time frame provided; therefore, no equal protection violation occurred because different classifications were not created under the act or the rules adopted by the Wyoming Department of Education. Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Transitional school funding recapture limits constitutional. —

A $250,000 cap imposed on transitional hold harmless payments applicable to wealthy school districts subject to revenue recapture bore a rational relationship to a legitimate state interest in making the transition to a cost-based school funding system and thus did not violate equal protection provisions of the Wyoming Constitution. Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999).

Distribution of public school funds upon basis of wealth is suspect classification. —

Funding a public school system where money is distributed upon the basis of wealth or lack thereof is in a suspect classification, requiring the court's strict scrutiny test to determine if it is achieving a compelling state interest. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

School funding from property tax violates section. —

Although the quality of a child's education in the state, measured in terms of dollars available for that purpose, is dependent upon the property tax resources of his school district, the right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Wyoming's public school finance system unconstitutional. —

See Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 1995).

Required licensure of general nondental anesthesiologists constitutional. —

No offense was dealt the equal protection clause of the United States constitution or the Wyoming state constitution by requiring that general nondental anesthesiologists be properly licensed as physicians under the Wyoming Medical Practice Act, chapter 26 of title 33, and not just be declared qualified anesthesiologists by an accredited residency program. Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 1987), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Mental Health Professions Practice Act violates equal protection. —

Under the Mental Health Professions Practice Act, private counselors rights to equal protection have been transgressed; none of the evidence demonstrates that supervision by public, licensed counselors results in the qualification of counselors who are more competent or more ethical and, thus, more likely to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. The differentiation of the public employer or the charitable employer from the private, for-profit employer cannot be justified as a proper classification and, thus, is not a legitimate exercise in police power. This classification is not founded on a reasonable basis, is arbitrary, and constitutes unwarranted discrimination. It is a violation of equal protection and must be set aside. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

The mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

violate guarantees of equal protection under Wyo. Const. art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Constitutional to require nonresident hunters to employ guides. —

Section 23-2-401(a), requiring nonresident big game hunters who hunt in federal wilderness areas to employ guides, does not violate the equal protection provisions of the federal and state constitutions, nor the privileges and immunities clause of the United States constitution. O'Brien v. State, 711 P.2d 1144,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1986).

Section

1-3-111

violates section. —

Section

1-3-111

, which prior to its 1981 amendment provided that no action shall be brought more than 10 years after substantial completion of improvement to real property against any person performing or furnishing design, planning, supervision, construction or supervision of construction of the improvement, violated this section and § 8 of this article, and § 27 of article 3. Phillips v. ABC Builders, 611 P.2d 821,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1980).

Grand jury constitutional. —

The perceived advantages which flow from the procedure involving a complaint and preliminary examination followed by an information do not justify a conclusion that a defendant is denied equal protection of the law because a grand jury is used. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Prosecutions by information. —

This section is not violated by a statute providing that prosecutions may be by information after preliminary hearing, and suspending the grand jury system. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated for equal protection purposes. —

The defendant argued that he was being treated differently from a person who was serving the same amount of time in the state penitentiary because those in prison were afforded opportunities such as good time, vocational and educational programs, merit programs, library and recreational facilities and therapy programs which were not available in the county jail; however, this equal protection claim failed because felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated persons for purposes of identification of a classification of similarly situated persons who are being treated differently. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Suspension of license unconstitutional. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and § 31-7-128(f), which provide for the driver's license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, represent constitutionally prohibited special legislation that lacks rational differentiation from persons aged 19 and 20 who are also denied the right to use alcoholic beverages, constituting a similar class and, for that matter, those of any age whose excessive use makes their use illegal. Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Commercial driver's equal protection rights. —

Commercial truck driver's argument that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-305(n) violated his equal protection rights by inflicting a greater burden on commercial drivers than non-commercial drivers failed, because the driver conceded that the constitutionality of this section had been upheld in Wilson v. State ex rel. Office of Hearing Exam'r, 841 P.2d 90 (Wyo. 1992),
and the driver's briefs included no persuasive argument for revisiting the issue and overturning the prior action.
King v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2007 WY 109, 161 P.3d 1086,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2007).

Individual IRA not statutorily exempt from process. —

An IRA funded by an individual is not entitled to an exemption under §

1-20-110

(exemption from process of retirement funds and accounts), nor is the classification created by the statute violative of this section of the Constitution. Kingston v. Honeycutt (In re Honeycutt), 908 P.2d 976,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1995).

Funding for county courts. —

Statutory provision allowing the legislature to deny full funding for county courts in counties having populations of less than 30,000 violated the constitutional mandate for equal protection of the laws where there had been disparate treatment of counties having populations of less than 30,000. Board of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 941 P.2d 742,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1997).

Funding operation and maintenance of school facilities. —

State's approach to funding operation and maintenance of a school district's facilities did not violate the Equal Protection Clause because the differences in funding between school districts was based upon the costs deemed appropriate by the legislature and not based on wealth-based disparities.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

Felony murder prosecution for abuse of child. —

Defendant's prosecution for felony murder under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

, based on his abuse of a child under 16, rather than for child abuse, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-503

, did not violate equal protection, under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 2, or this section, as the provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

, allowing prosecution for first degree murder in cases of child abuse, give fair notice that life in prison or execution are possible penalties. Johnson v. State, 2003 WY 9, 61 P.3d 1234,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Feb. 18, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 841, 124 S. Ct. 108, 157 L. Ed. 2d 74, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 5710 (U.S. 2003).

Declining first-time offender status. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion and did not violate defendant's right to equal protection of the laws by declining to grant defendant first-offender status under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-301

; trial court properly denied such status in order to punish defendant for the premeditated night-time burglary and to deter other students.
Kelley v. State, 2009 WY 3, 199 P.3d 521,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2009).

Former section

14-3-105

validly based on difference in ages and maturity levels. —

Based on the age difference between defendant, an 18-year-old male, and the victim, a 14-year-old female, and their relative maturity levels, it could not be concluded that defendant showed that a fundamental right had been violated by prosecuting him under former §

14-3-105

. Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 35. Ex post facto laws; impairing obligation of contracts.

No ex post facto law, nor any law impairing the obligation of contracts, shall ever be made.

Cross references. —

As to contracts generally, see chapter 23 of title 1.

Sex offender registration act does not violate ex post facto clause. —

In a case where defendant challenged his conviction for failure to register as a sex offender, the Wyoming Sex Offender Registration Act did not violate the ex post facto clauses of the federal or state constitutions because the effects of the Act did not negate the legislature's intent to impose a regulatory scheme as it bore a rational connection to the goal of public safety by providing for identification of individuals convicted of sex offenses, and by making that information available to law enforcement agencies and the general public; and its requirements constituted a reasonable method of achieving the goal of public safety. Kammerer v. State, 2014 WY 50, 322 P.3d 827,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2014).

State ex post facto protection not greater than federal counterpart. —

State constitutional ex post facto clause does not provide greater protection against ex post facto laws than its federal counterpart. Kammerer v. State, 2014 WY 50, 322 P.3d 827,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2014).

This section is an emphatic command to the state legislature.

Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

An ex post facto law may be one which alters the situation of an accused to his disadvantage.

In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

The real question is whether the accused has been deprived of a substantial right

by reason of the change in law. In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

Changes which may be designated as mostly procedural

do not, as a rule, come within the ex post facto doctrine. However, that in itself is not the true test; and a statute must be considered to be ex post facto and unconstitutional if it alters the situation of the accused to his disadvantage. In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

A statute may not be applied retroactively

so as to deprive contracting parties of their rights. In re Hagood, 356 P.2d 135,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1960). See also, Mustanen v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 50 Wyo. 462, 62 P.2d 287,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1936).

Legislature could repeal an act establishing an agricultural college

which had been located by a vote of the people. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

For discussion of Wyoming Sex Offenders Registration Act as constitutional,

see Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Defendant tried under mental illness provisions in effect at time of crime. —

The defendant, who committed certain offenses prior to July 1, 1983, was, nevertheless, tried under §§

7-11-304

and

7-11-305

, relating to mental illness or deficiency, as they existed after their 1983 amendments, effective on the above mentioned date. The defendant's psychiatric witness testified that the defendant could not resist his impulses at the time of the incidents in question, which was sufficient, under pre-1983 §

7-11-304

(a), to relieve a person of responsibility for criminal conduct. The defendant was prejudiced by the court failing to give an instruction under pre-1983 §

7-11-305

(b), under which the state had the obligation to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was able to “conform to his conduct to the requirements of the law,” as defined in pre-1983 § 7-11-304(a), and by, instead, giving an instruction under post-1983 § 7-11-305(b), under which the burden was shifted to the defendant to prove that he could not “conform his conduct to the conduct of the law,” as now defined in § 7-11-304(a) to exclude the “irresistible impulse” test. Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985).

Prosecution of crimes by information in place of indictment. —

A statute providing that crimes could be prosecuted by information in place of indictment by a grand jury was not ex post facto in applying to offenses committed before the passage of the act. In re Wright, 3 Wyo. 478, 27 P. 565,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1891).

Ex post facto prosecutorial cost assessment unconstitutional. —

Because the assessment of costs under §

7-11-505

against a defendant convicted prior to the effective date of the statute would be a substantive detriment, such costs could not be assessed without violating the ex post facto prohibition. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Habitual offender sentence enhancement not an ex post facto law. —

Habitual offender sentence enhancement statute does not violate constitutional prohibition against ex post facto laws.
Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2009).

Appeal by state of dismissal of juvenile proceedings. —

A county attorney cannot appeal a dismissal of proceedings brought against a minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1971, §

14-6-201

et seq., when the proceedings are based upon a violation of law alleged to have been committed prior to enactment of the 1971 law, since the Juvenile Court Act of 1951 contained no provision for appeal on the part of the state. In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

Ex post facto administrative penalty unconstitutional. —

Even though resulting from the action of an administrative agency, the application of an increased fine and assessment of the penalty of an extended license suspension, authorized by statute enacted after the event occurred, offends as ex post facto. Ballard v. Wyoming Pari-Mutuel Comm'n, 750 P.2d 286,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1988).

Establishment of qualification for newspapers entitled to publish legal notices. —

Former statute, providing that a newspaper having the right to publish notices with legal effect must have been established for one year or more, was not unconstitutional as violating this section. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Reasonable insurance regulation constitutional. —

Where an insurance regulation is a reasonable exercise of the police power of the state for the promotion of the safety and welfare of those subject to its jurisdiction, it cannot constitute an impairment of contract. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

Issuance of revenue bonds for property purchased by municipality. —

Under a law giving municipalities power to purchase public utility plants, no power could be implied authorizing a town to issue revenue bonds to pay for such a purchase, especially where the property to be purchased had over half the assessed value of all taxable property in the town and the town already had bonded indebtedness of $53,000.00 and the school district of which it was a part, of
Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

Priority of liens. —

Lien of state under bonds issued by drainage district in which permanent school funds were invested is superior to lien of general taxes. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985); Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Belco Petroleum Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 587 P.2d 204,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1978); Mariano & Assocs. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 737 P.2d 323,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1987); Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 784 P.2d 627,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

, 26 A.L.R.2d 647 (1951); Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974); Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975); Allhusen v. State ex rel. Wyo. Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act; Kahrs v. Board of Trustees for Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 901 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1995); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures, 81 ALR3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway, 81 ALR3d 564.

17A C.J.S Contracts §§ 219 to 228.